src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-maria_gt-norm.yaml
---
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - olla: # V_OLLA
    olla+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: oldu
    olla+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: ollut

    # V_KANDUA
    kandua+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kannettu
    kandua+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kannetut

    # V_OTTUA
    ottua+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: otettu
    ottua+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: otettu

    # V_OTTUA
    pergua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: perretäh
    pergua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: perrimmö
    pergua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: perrittö
    pergua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: perretäh
    pergua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: perrettävy
    pergua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: perrettävät

    # V_HEITTIÄ
    heittiä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: heitetty
    heittiä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: heitetyt

    # V_TIEDIÄ
    tiediä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tietäh
    tiediä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tiettih
    tiediä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [tiettävy, tiijettävy]
    tiediä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [tiettävät, tiijettävät]

    # V_PIDIÄ
    pidiä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pien
    pidiä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: piet
    pidiä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: piemmö
    pidiä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: piettö
    pidiä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pie
    pidiä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pietty
    pidiä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pietyt

    # V_PIDIÄ, pidäsgo eriže V_VEDIÄ?
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vien
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viet
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viemmö
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viettö
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vietäh
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vie
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vein
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: veit
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: veimmö
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: veittö
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viettih
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vietäh
    vediä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viettih
    vediä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: vietty
    vediä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: vietyt
    vediä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: viettävy
    vediä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: viettävät

    # V_VIIJÄ
    viijä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: viedy
    viijä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: vievyt

    # V_MENETTIÄ
    menettiä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: menetetty
    menettiä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: menetetyt

    # V_PUNUO
    kaččuo+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kačottu
    kaččuo+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kačotut

    # V_VALUO
    kuččuo+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kučuttu
    kuččuo+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kučutut

    # V_SUALISTUO
    azettuo+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: azetuttu
    azettuo+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: azetutut

    # V_PEZEVYÖ
    lykkävyö+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lykkävynnyh
    lykkävyö+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lykkävynnyöt

    # V_EČČIE
    hyppie+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hypitty
    hyppie+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: hypityt

    # V_POTKIN 
    oppie+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: opittu
    oppie+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: opitut

    # V_LUGIE
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lugou
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lugietah
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luvin
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luvit
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luvimmo
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luvitto
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lugiettih
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lugietah
    lugie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lugiettih
    lugie+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lugiettavu
    lugie+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lugiettavat

    # V_IMIE
    imie+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: imöy

    # V_TUNDIE
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tundou
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  tundietah
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tunzin
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tunzit
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tunzi
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tunzimmo
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tunzitto
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tundiettih
    tundie+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  tundiettih
    tundie+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tundiettavu
    tundie+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tundiettavat

    # V_JUVVA
    juvva+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: juvvah
    juvva+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juodu
    juvva+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: juovut

    # V_MYVVÄ
    myvvä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: myvväh
    myvvä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: myödy
    myvvä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: myövyt

    # V_KÄVVÄ
    kävvä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kävyin
    kävvä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kävyit
    kävvä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kävyi
    kävvä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kävyimmö
    kävvä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kävyimmö
    kävvä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: käydy
    kävvä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: käyvyt

    # V_SUAJA
    suaja+V+Inf: suaha
    suaja+V+Inf: suaja
    suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: suajah
    suaja+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: suadu
    suaja+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: suavut

    # V_JIÄJÄ
    jiäjä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jiäjäh
    jiäjä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: jiädy
    jiäjä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: jiävyt

    # V_PÄITÄ
    päitä+V+Inf: pätä/päitä/päijä
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: päin
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: päit
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pädöy
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: päimmö
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: päittö
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: päitäh/päijäh
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: päi
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: päin
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: päit
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pädi
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: päimmö
    päitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: päittö
    päitä+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: pädemäh
    päitä+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ine: pädemäs
    päitä+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ade: pädemäl
    päitä+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Abe: pädemättäh
    päitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: päinnyh
    päitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: päinnyöt
    päitä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: päitty
    päitä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: päityt
    päitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pättävy
    päitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pättävät

    # V_VOIJA
    voija+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: voijah
    voija+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: voin
    voija+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: voit
    voija+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: voi
    voija+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: voimmo
    voija+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: voitto
    voija+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: voidu
    voija+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: voivut

    # V_ROIJA tarkista segaparadigmu roita/roija

    # V_ALLATA
    muata+V+Inf: muata
    muata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: muatah
    muata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: muattih
    muata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: muannuh
    muata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: muannuot
    muata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: muatah
    muata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: muattih
    muata+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: muattu
    muata+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: muatut
    muata+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: muattavu
    muata+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: muattavat

    # V_ALLATA
    luvata+V+Inf: luvata
    luvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luvatah
    luvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luvattih
    luvata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: luvannuh
    luvata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: luvannuot
    luvata+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: luvattu
    luvata+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: luvatut
    luvata+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: luvattavu
    luvata+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: luvattavat

    # V_AVATA
    avata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: avuan
    avata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: avuat
    avata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: avuau
    avata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: avuammo
    avata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: avuatto
    avata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: avua
    avata+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: avuamah
    avata+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ine: avuamas

    # V_BÖVVÄTÄ
    hyllätä+V+Inf: hyllätä
    hyllätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hylgiän
    hyllätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hylgiät
    hyllätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hylgiäy
    hyllätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hylgiämmö
    hyllätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hylgiättö
    hyllätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hyllätäh
    hyllätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: hylgiä
    hyllätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hyllättih
    hyllätä+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: hylgiämäh
    hyllätä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hyllännyh
    hyllätä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: hyllännyöt
    hyllätä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hyllätty
    hyllätä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: hyllätyt
    hyllätä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hyllättävy
    hyllätä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hyllättävät

    # V_HYRRÄTÄ (V_BÖVVÄTÄ?)
    ähkätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ähkiän
    ähkätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ähkiät
    ähkätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ähkiäy
    ähkätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ähkiämmö
    ähkätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ähkiättö
    ähkätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ähkiä

    # V_RUVETA
    ruveta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ruvennuh
    ruveta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: ruvennuot
    ruveta+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ruvettu
    ruveta+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: ruvetut
    ruveta+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ruvettavu
    ruveta+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ruvettavat

    # V_LANGETA has both ie- and ne-stems
    halleta+V+Inf: halleta
    halleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: halgien/halgenen
    halleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: halgiet/halgenet
    halleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: halgieu/halgenou
    halleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: halgiemmo/halgenemmo
    halleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: halgietto/halgenetto
    halleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: halletah
    halleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: halgie/halgene
    halleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hallettih
    halleta+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: halgiemah

    # V_ALETA
    hapata+V+Inf: hapata
    hapata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hapatah
    hapata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hapattih

    # V_REVITÄ
    revitä+V+Inf: revitä
    revitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: revitäh
    revitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: revittih
    revitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: revinnyh
    revitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: revinnyöt
    revitä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: revitty
    revitä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: revityt
    revitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: revitävy
    revitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: revittävät

    # V_KÄITÄ
    käitä+V+Inf: käitä
    käitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: käitäh
    käitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kägein
    käitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kägeit
    käitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kägei
    käitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kägeimmö
    käitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kägeittö
    käitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: käittih
    käitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: käinnyh
    käitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: käinnyöt
    käitä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: käitty
    käitä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: käityt
    käitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: käittävy
    käitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: käittävät

    # V_KIKOTA
    kavota+V+Inf: kavota
    kavota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kavotah
    kavota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kavottih
    kavota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kavonnuh
    kavota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kavonnuot
    kavota+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kavottu
    kavota+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kavotut
    kavota+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kavottavu
    kavota+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kavottavat

    # V_HÖPSÖTÄ
    höpsötä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: höpsyön
    höpsötä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: höpsyöt
    höpsötä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: höpsyöy
    höpsötä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: höpsyömmö
    höpsötä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: höpsyöttö
    höpsötä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: höpsyö
    höpsötä+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: höpsyömäh

    # V_ARVOTA
    lumota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lumuon
    lumota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luomuot
    lumota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lumuou
    lumota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lumuommo
    lumota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lumuotto
    lumota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lumuo 
    lumota+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: lumuomah

    # V_BAUHUTA
    vainuta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vainuon
    vainuta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vainuot
    vainuta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vainuou
    vainuta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vainuommo
    vainuta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:  vainuotto
    vainuta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vainuo
    vainuta+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: vainuomah

    # V_TULLA
    vuolla+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: vuoldu
    vuolla+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: vuollut

    # V_KUULTA
    purta+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: purtu
    purta+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: purrut

    # V_PESTÄ
    piästä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: piästy
    piästä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: piästyt

    # V_VIERTÄ 

    # V_NOSTA
    nosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nostah
    nosta+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nostu
    nosta+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: nossut

    # V_JUOSTA_BACK
    juosta+V+Inf: juosta
    juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: juostah
    juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juostih
    juosta+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: juoksemah
    juosta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juossuh
    juosta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: juossuot
    juosta+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juostu
    juosta+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: juossut
    juosta+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: juostavu
    juosta+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: juostavat

    # V_NÄHTÄ
    nähtä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nägi
    nähtä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nähtih
    nähtä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nähty
    nähtä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: nähtyt
